Maryland, session 2026, HB1488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Declaration of Rights
Article 6.
That all persons invested with the Legislative or Executive powers of Government
are the Trustees of the Public, and, as such, accountable for their conduct: Wherefore,
whenever the ends of Government are perverted, and public liberty manifestly endangered,
and all other means of redress are ineffectual, the People may, and of right ought, to reform
the old, or establish a new Government; the doctrine of non–resistance against arbitrary
power and oppression is absurd, slavish and destructive of the good and happiness of
[mankind] HUMANITY.
Article 13.
That every [man] PERSON hath a right to petition the Legislature for the redress of
grievances in a peaceable and orderly manner.
Article 19.

HOUSE BILL 1488 3
That every [man] PERSON, for any injury done to [him] THEM in [his] THEIR
person or property, ought to have remedy by the course of the Law of the land, and ought
to have justice and right, freely without sale, fully without any denial, and speedily without
delay, according to the Law of the land.
Article 21.
That in all criminal prosecutions, every [man] PERSON hath a right to be informed
of the accusation against [him] THEM; to have a copy of the Indictment, or charge, in due
time (if required) to prepare for [his] THEIR defence; to be allowed counsel; to be confronted
with the witnesses against [him] THEM; to have process for [his] witnesses; to examine the
witnesses for and against [him] THEM on oath; and to a speedy trial by an impartial jury,
without whose unanimous consent [he] THAT PERSON ought not to be found guilty.
Article 22.
That no [man] PERSON ought to be compelled to give evidence against [himself]
THEMSELF in a criminal case.
Article 24.
That no [man] PERSON ought to be taken or imprisoned or disseized of [his] THEIR
freehold, liberties or privileges, or outlawed, or exiled, or, in any manner, destroyed, or
deprived of [his] THEIR life, liberty or property, but by the judgment of [his] THEIR peers,
or by the Law of the land.
Article 33.
That the independency and uprightness of Judges are essential to the impartial
administration of Justice, and a great security to the rights and liberties of the People:
Wherefore, the Judges shall not be removed, except in the manner, and for the causes
provided in this Constitution. No Judge shall hold any other office, civil or military, or
political trust, or employment of any kind, whatsoever, under the Constitution or Laws of
this State, or of the United States, or any of them; except that a Judge may be a member of
a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States or a member of the militia of
the United States or this State; or receive fees, or perquisites of any kind, for the discharge
of [his] THE JUDGE’S official duties.
Article 36.
That as it is the duty of every [man] PERSON to worship God in such manner as [he]
THAT PERSON thinks most acceptable to [Him] GOD, all persons are equally entitled to
protection in their religious liberty; wherefore, no person ought by any law to be molested
in [his] THEIR person or estate, on account of [his] THEIR religious persuasion, or
profession, or for [his] THEIR religious practice, unless, under the color of religion, [he]

HOUSE BILL 1488
THAT PERSON shall disturb the good order, peace or safety of the State, or shall infringe
the laws of morality, or injure others in their natural, civil or religious rights; nor ought
any person to be compelled to frequent, or maintain, or contribute, unless on contract, to
maintain, any place of worship, or any ministry; nor shall any person, otherwise competent,
be deemed incompetent as a witness, or juror, on account of [his] THEIR religious belief,
provided, [he] THAT PERSON believes in the existence of God, and that under [His] GOD’S
dispensation such person will be held morally accountable for [his] THEIR acts, and be
rewarded or punished therefor either in this world or in the world to come.
Nothing shall prohibit or require the making reference to belief in, reliance upon, or
invoking the aid of God or a Supreme Being in any governmental or public document,
proceeding, activity, ceremony, school, institution, or place.
Nothing in this article shall constitute an establishment of religion.
Article 39.
That the manner of administering an oath or affirmation to any person, ought to be
such as those of the religious persuasion, profession, or denomination, of which [he] THAT
PERSON is a member, generally esteem the most effectual confirmation by the attestation
of the Divine Being.
Article 40.
That the liberty of the press ought to be inviolably preserved; that every citizen of
the State ought to be allowed to speak, write and publish [his] THEIR sentiments on all
subjects, being responsible for the abuse of that privilege.
Article I – Elective Franchise
5.
It shall be the duty of the General Assembly to pass Laws to punish, with fine and
imprisonment, any person, who shall remove into any election district, or precinct of any
ward of the City of Baltimore, not for the purpose of acquiring a bona fide residence therein,
but for the purpose of voting at an approaching election, or, who shall vote in any election
district, or ward, in which [he] THAT PERSON does not reside, (except in the case provided
for in this Article,) or shall, at the same election, vote in more than one election district, or
precinct, or shall vote, or offer to vote, in any name not [his] THEIR own, or in place of any
other person of the same name, or shall vote in any county in which [he] THAT PERSON
does not reside.
6.
If any person shall give, or offer to give, directly or indirectly, any bribe, present or
reward, or any promise, or any security, for the payment or delivery of money, or any other

HOUSE BILL 1488 5
thing, to induce any voter to refrain from casting [his] THAT PERSON’S vote, or to prevent
[him] THAT PERSON in any way from voting, or to procure a vote for any candidate or
person proposed, or voted for as the elector of President, and Vice President of the United
States, or Representative in Congress or for any office of profit or trust, created by the
Constitution or Laws of this State, or by the Ordinances, or Authority of the Mayor and
City Council of Baltimore, the person giving, or offering to give and the person receiving
the same, and any person who gives or causes to be given, an illegal vote, knowing it to be
such, at any election to be hereafter held in this State, shall, on conviction in a Court of
Law, in addition to the penalties now or hereafter to be imposed by law, be forever
disqualified to hold any office of profit or trust, or to vote at any election thereafter. But the
General Assembly may in its discretion remove the above penalty and all other penalties
upon the vote seller so as to place the penalties for the purchase of votes on the vote buyer
alone.
9.
Every person elected, or appointed, to any office of profit or trust, under this
Constitution, or under the Laws, made pursuant thereto, shall, before [he enters]
ENTERING upon the duties of such office, take and subscribe the following oath, or
affirmation: I, ..........., do swear, (or affirm, as the case may be,) that I will support the
Constitution of the United States; and that I will be faithful and bear true allegiance to the
State of Maryland, and support the Constitution and Laws thereof; and that I will, to the
best of my skill and judgment, diligently and faithfully, without partiality or prejudice,
execute the office of .............., according to the Constitution and Laws of this State, (and, if
a Governor, Senator, Member of the House of Delegates, or Judge,) that I will not directly
or indirectly, receive the profits or any part of the profits of any other office during the term
of my acting as ..................
10.
Any officer elected or appointed in pursuance of the provisions of this Constitution,
may qualify, either according to the existing provisions of law, in relation to officers under
the present Constitution, or before the Governor of the State, or before any Clerk of any
Court of Record in any part of the State; but in case an officer shall qualify out of the County
in which [he] THAT OFFICER resides, an official copy of [his] THEIR oath shall be filed and
recorded in the Clerk’s office of the Circuit Court of the County in which [he] THE OFFICER
may reside, or in the Clerk’s office of the Superior Court of the City of Baltimore, if [he]
THE OFFICER shall reside therein. All words or phrases, used in creating public offices and
positions under the Constitution and laws of this State, which denote the masculine gender
shall be construed to include the feminine gender, unless the contrary intention is
specifically expressed.
Article II – Executive Department
1.

HOUSE BILL 1488
The executive power of the State shall be vested in a Governor, whose term of office
shall commence on the third Wednesday of January next ensuing [his] THE GOVERNOR’S
election, and continue for four years, and until [his] THE GOVERNOR’S successor shall
have qualified; and a person who has served two consecutive popular elective terms of office
as Governor shall be ineligible to succeed [himself] THEMSELF as Governor for the term
immediately following the second of said two consecutive popular elective terms.
1A.
There shall be a Lieutenant Governor, who shall have only the duties delegated to
[him] THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR by the Governor and shall have such compensation
as the General Assembly shall provide by law, except that beginning in the year 1978 the
salary of the Lieutenant Governor shall be as provided under Section 21A of this Article.
No person who is ineligible under this Constitution to be elected Governor shall be eligible
to hold the office of Lieutenant Governor.
1B.
Each candidate who shall seek a nomination for Governor, under any method
provided by law for such nomination, including primary elections, shall at the time of filing
for said office designate a candidate for Lieutenant Governor, and the names of the said
candidate for Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be listed on the primary election
ballot, or otherwise considered for nomination jointly with each other. No candidate for
Governor may designate a candidate for Lieutenant Governor to contest for the said offices
jointly with [him] THE CANDIDATE FOR GOVERNOR without the consent of the said
candidate for Lieutenant Governor, and no candidate for Lieutenant Governor may
designate a candidate for Governor, to contest jointly for said offices with [him] THE
CANDIDATE FOR LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR without the consent of the said candidate for
Governor, said consent to be in writing on a form provided for such purpose and filed at the
time the said candidates shall file their certificates of candidacy, or other documents by
which they seek nomination. In any election, including a primary election, candidates for
Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be listed jointly on the ballot, and a vote cast for
the candidate for Governor shall also be cast for Lieutenant Governor jointly listed on the
ballot with [him] THE CANDIDATE FOR GOVERNOR, and the election of Governor, or the
nomination of a candidate for Governor, also shall constitute the election for the same term,
or the nomination, of the Lieutenant Governor who was listed on the ballot or was being
considered jointly with [him] THE CANDIDATE FOR GOVERNOR.
3.
The Speaker of the House of Delegates shall then open the said Returns, in the
presence of both Houses; and the persons having the highest number of votes for these
offices, and being constitutionally eligible, shall be the Governor and Lieutenant Governor,
and shall qualify, in the manner herein prescribed, on the third Wednesday of January next
ensuing [his] THE GOVERNOR’S election, or as soon thereafter as may be practicable.

HOUSE BILL 1488 7
5.
A person to be eligible for the office of Governor or Lieutenant Governor must have
attained the age of thirty years, and must have been a resident and registered voter of the
State for five years next immediately preceding [his] THE CANDIDATE’S election.
9.
[He] THE GOVERNOR shall take care that the Laws are faithfully executed.
10.
[He] THE GOVERNOR shall nominate, and, by and with the advice and consent of
the Senate, appoint all civil and military officers of the State, whose appointment, or
election, is not otherwise herein provided for, unless a different mode of appointment be
prescribed by the Law creating the office.
10A.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a Governor may not
appoint a person to an office in the Executive Branch of State Government during:
(1) The period between a primary election in which the Governor is not
renominated or is ineligible to succeed [himself] THEMSELF AS GOVERNOR and the
inauguration of the next succeeding Governor; or
(2) If the Governor is nominated in the primary election but defeated in the
general election, the period between the general election and the inauguration of the next
succeeding Governor.
(b) In an emergency during the periods described in subsection (a) of this section,
a Governor may appoint a person to an office in the Executive Branch that the Governor
has the power to fill on a temporary basis upon filing a statement of emergency with the
Secretary of State. Appointments made under this subsection are subject to the approval
of the next succeeding Governor, who may remove the temporary officeholder and appoint
a replacement.
11.
In case of any vacancy during the recess of the Senate, in any office which the
Governor has power to fill, [he] THE GOVERNOR shall appoint some suitable person to
said office, whose commission shall continue in force until the end of the next session of the
Legislature, or until some other person is appointed to the same office, whichever shall first
occur; and the nomination of the person thus appointed during the recess, or of some other
person in [his] THE PERSON’S place, shall be made to the Senate on the first day of the
next regular meeting of the Senate.

HOUSE BILL 1488
15.
The Governor may suspend or arrest any military officer of the State for disobedience
of orders, or other military offense; and may remove [him] THE MILITARY OFFICER in
pursuance of the sentence of a Court–Martial; and may remove for incompetency, or
misconduct, all civil officers who received appointment from the Executive for a term of
years.
16.
The Governor shall convene the Legislature, or the Senate alone, on extraordinary
occasions; and whenever from the presence of an enemy, or from any other cause, the seat
of Government shall become an unsafe place for the meeting of the Legislature, [he] THE
GOVERNOR may direct their sessions to be held at some other convenient place.
18.
It shall be the duty of the Governor, semiannually (and oftener, if [he deem] THE
GOVERNOR DEEMS it expedient) to examine under oath the Treasurer and Comptroller
of the State on all matters pertaining to their respective offices; and inspect and review
their Bank and other Account Books.
19.
[He] THE GOVERNOR shall, from time to time, inform the Legislature of the
condition of the State and recommend to their consideration such measures as [he] THE
GOVERNOR may judge necessary and expedient.
20.
[He] THE GOVERNOR shall have power to grant reprieves and pardons, except in
cases of impeachment, and in cases, in which [he] THE GOVERNOR is prohibited by other
Articles of this Constitution; and to remit fines and forfeitures for offences against the
State; but shall not remit the principal or interest of any debt due the State, except, in cases
of fines and forfeitures; and before granting a nolle prosequi, or pardon, [he] THE
GOVERNOR shall give notice, in one or more newspapers, of the application made for it,
and of the day on, or after which, [his] THE GOVERNOR’S decision will be given; and in
every case, in which [he] THE GOVERNOR exercises this power, [he] THE GOVERNOR
shall report to either Branch of the Legislature, whenever required, the petitions,
recommendations and reasons, which influenced [his] THE GOVERNOR’S decision.
21.
The Governor shall reside at the seat of government, and, from and after the fourth
Wednesday in January 1967, shall receive for [his] THE GOVERNOR’S services an annual

HOUSE BILL 1488 9
salary of twenty–five thousand dollars, except that beginning in the year 1978 the salary
of the Governor shall be as provided in Section 21A of this Article.
21A.
(a) The salaries of the Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be as provided in
this section.
(b) The Governor’s Salary Commission is created. It consists of seven members:
The State Treasurer; three appointed by the President of the Senate; and three appointed
by the Speaker of the House of Delegates. Members of the General Assembly and officers
and employees of the State or a political subdivision of the State are not eligible for
appointment to the Commission. The members of the Commission shall elect a member to
be [chairman] CHAIR, and the concurrence of at least five members is required for any
formal Commission action. The terms of members shall be for 4 years, except that the
persons first appointed to the Commission shall serve from June 1, 1977 until May 31,
1980. The members of the Commission are eligible for reappointment. Members shall serve
without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in carrying out
responsibilities under this section.
(c) Within ten days after the commencement of the regular session of the General
Assembly in 1978, and within ten days after the commencement of the regular session of
the General Assembly each fourth year thereafter, the Commission shall make a written
recommendation to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, and other members of the General
Assembly as to the salary of the Governor and Lieutenant Governor.
(d) The recommendation shall be introduced as a joint resolution in each House
of the General Assembly not later than the fifteenth day of the session. The General
Assembly may amend the joint resolution to decrease the recommended salaries, but may
not amend the joint resolution to increase the recommended salaries. If the General
Assembly fails to adopt a joint resolution in accordance with this section within 50 days
after its introduction, the salaries recommended by the Commission shall apply. If the
General Assembly amends the joint resolution in accordance with this section, the salaries
specified in the joint resolution, as amended, shall apply. If the Commission recommends
no salary change, a joint resolution shall not be introduced.
(e) The Commission may not recommend salaries lower than that received by the
incumbent Governor at the time the recommendation is made; and the General Assembly
may not amend the joint resolution to provide for salaries lower than that received by the
incumbent Governor and Lieutenant Governor.
(f) A change in salary resulting from either Commission recommendation or
amended joint resolution under this section shall take effect at the beginning of the next
ensuing term of the Governor and Lieutenant Governor.

HOUSE BILL 1488
(g) Commission inaction or failure of the Commission to meet the requirements
of this section with respect to proposing a change in salary for the Governor and Lieutenant
Governor shall result in no change in salary.
22.
A Secretary of State shall be appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and
consent of the Senate, who shall continue in office, unless sooner removed by the Governor,
till the end of the official term of the Governor from whom [he] THE SECRETARY OF
STATE received [his] THE SECRETARY OF STATE’S appointment, and receive such
annual salary as the General Assembly may from time to time by law prescribe.
23.
The Secretary of State shall carefully keep and preserve a Record of all official acts
and proceedings, which may at all times be inspected by a committee of either Branch of
the Legislature; and [he] THE SECRETARY OF STATE shall perform such other duties as
may be prescribed by Law, or as may properly belong to [his] THE SECRETARY OF
STATE’S office, together with all clerical duty belonging to the Executive Department.
Article III – Legislative Department
6.
A member of the General Assembly shall be elected by the registered voters of the
legislative or delegate district from which [he] THE PERSON seeks election, to serve for a
term of four years beginning on the second Wednesday of January following [his] THE
MEMBER’S election.
10.
No member of Congress, or person holding any civil, or military office under the
United States, shall be eligible as a Senator, or Delegate; and if any person shall after [his]
THE PERSON’S election as Senator, or Delegate, be elected to Congress, or be appointed to
any office, civil, or military, under the Government of the United States, [his] THE
SENATOR’S OR THE DELEGATE’S acceptance thereof, shall vacate [his] THE PERSON’S
seat; except that a Senator or Delegate may be a member of a reserve component of the
armed forces of the United States or a member of the militia of the United States or this
State.
12.
No Collector, Receiver, or Holder of public money shall be eligible as Senator or
Delegate, or to any office of profit, or trust, under this State, until [he] THAT PERSON shall
have accounted for, and paid into the Treasury all sums on the books thereof, charged to,
and due by [him] THAT PERSON.

HOUSE BILL 1488 11
13.
(a) (1) In case of death, disqualification, resignation, refusal to act, expulsion,
or removal from the county or city for which [he] THE PERSON shall have been elected, of
any person who shall have been chosen as a Delegate or Senator, or in case of a tie between
two or more such qualified persons, the Governor shall appoint a person to fill such vacancy
from a person whose name shall be submitted to [him] THE GOVERNOR in writing, within
thirty days after the occurrence of the vacancy, by the Central Committee of the political
party, if any, with which the Delegate or Senator, so vacating, had been affiliated, at the
time of the last election or appointment of the vacating Senator or Delegate, in the County
or District from which [he or she] THE DELEGATE OR SENATOR was appointed or elected,
provided that the appointee shall be of the same political party, if any, as was that of the
Delegate or Senator, whose office is to be filled, at the time of the last election or
appointment of the vacating Delegate or Senator, and it shall be the duty of the Governor
to make said appointment within fifteen days after the submission thereof to [him] THE
GOVERNOR.
(2) If a name is not submitted by the Central Committee within thirty days
after the occurrence of the vacancy, the Governor within another period of fifteen days shall
appoint a person, who shall be affiliated with the same political party, if any as was that of
the Delegate or Senator, whose office is to be filled, at the time of the last election or
appointment of the vacating Delegate or Senator, and who is otherwise properly qualified
to hold the office of Delegate or Senator in the District or County.
(3) In the event there is no Central Committee in the County or District
from which said vacancy is to be filled, the Governor shall within fifteen days after the
occurrence of such vacancy appoint a person, from the same political party, if any, as that
of the vacating Delegate or Senator, at the time of the last election or appointment of the
vacating Senator or Delegate, who is otherwise properly qualified to hold the office of
Delegate or Senator in such District or County.
(4) In every case when any person is so appointed by the Governor, [his]
THE PERSON’S appointment shall be deemed to be for the unexpired term of the person
whose office has become vacant.
(b) In addition, and in submitting a name to the Governor to fill a vacancy in a
Legislative or Delegate district, as the case may be, in any of the twenty–three counties of
Maryland, the Central Committee or committees shall follow these provisions:
(1) If the vacancy occurs in a district having the same boundaries as a
county, the Central Committee of the county shall submit the name of a resident of the
district.

HOUSE BILL 1488
(2) If the vacancy occurs in a district which has boundaries comprising a
portion of one county, the Central Committee of that county shall submit the name of a
resident of the district.
(3) If the vacancy occurs in a district which has boundaries comprising a
portion or all of two or more counties, the Central Committee of each county involved shall
have one vote for submitting the name of a resident of the district; and if there is a tie vote
between or among the Central Committees, the list of names there proposed shall be
submitted to the Governor, and [he] THE GOVERNOR shall make the appointment from
the list.
15.
(1) The General Assembly may continue its session so long as in its judgment the
public interest may require, for a period not longer than ninety days in each year. The
ninety days shall be consecutive unless otherwise provided by law. The General Assembly
may extend its session beyond ninety days, but not exceeding an additional thirty days, by
resolution concurred in by a three–fifths vote of the membership in each House. When the
General Assembly is convened by Proclamation of the Governor, the session shall not
continue longer than thirty days, but no additional compensation other than mileage and
other allowances provided by law shall be paid members of the General Assembly for special
session.
(2) Any compensation and allowances paid to members of the General Assembly
shall be as established by a commission known as the General Assembly Compensation
Commission. The Commission shall consist of nine members, five of whom shall be
appointed by the Governor, two of whom shall be appointed by the President of the Senate,
and two of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates. Members of
the General Assembly and officers and employees of the Government of the State of
Maryland or of any county, city, or other governmental unit of the State shall not be eligible
for appointment to the Commission. Members of the Commission shall be appointed for
terms of four years commencing on June 1 of each gubernatorial election year. Members of
the Commission are eligible for re–appointment. Any member of the Commission may be
removed by the Governor prior to the expiration of [his] THE MEMBER’S term for official
misconduct, incompetence, or neglect of duty. The members shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in carrying out their
responsibilities under this section. Decisions of the Commission must be concurred in by at
least five members.
(3) Within 15 days after the beginning of the regular session of the General
Assembly in 1974 and within 15 days after the beginning of the regular session in each
fourth year thereafter, the Commission by formal resolution shall submit its
determinations for compensation and allowances to the General Assembly. The General
Assembly may reduce or reject, but shall not increase any item in the resolution. The
resolution, with any reductions that shall have been concurred in by joint resolution of the
General Assembly, shall take effect and have the force of law as of the beginning of the
term of office of the next General Assembly. Rates of compensation and pensions shall be

HOUSE BILL 1488 13
uniform for all members of the General Assembly, except that the officers of the Senate and
the House of Delegates may receive higher compensation as determined by the General
Assembly Compensation Commission. The provisions of the Compensation Commission
resolution shall continue in force until superseded by any succeeding resolution.
(4) In no event shall the compensation and allowances be less than they were
prior to the establishment of the Compensation Commission.
17.
No Senator or Delegate, after qualifying as such, notwithstanding [he] THE
SENATOR OR DELEGATE may thereafter resign, shall during the whole period of time, for
which [he] THE SENATOR OR DELEGATE was elected, be eligible to any office, which shall
have been created, or the salary, or profits of which shall have been increased, during such
term.
35.
Extra compensation may not be granted or allowed by the General Assembly to any
public Officer, Agent, Servant or Contractor, after the service has been rendered, or the
contract entered into; nor may the salary or compensation of any public officer be increased
or diminished during [his] THE PUBLIC OFFICER’S term of office except those whose full
term of office is fixed by law in excess of 4 years. However, after January 1, 1956, for
services rendered after that date, the salary or compensation of any appointed public officer
of the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore may be increased or diminished at any time
during [his] THE PUBLIC OFFICER’S term of office; except that as to officers in the
Classified City Service, when the salary of any appointed public officer of the Mayor and
City Council of Baltimore however, increased or decreased, it may not again be increased
or decreased, as the case may be, during the term of such public officer.
50.
It shall be the duty of the General Assembly, at its first session, held after the
adoption of this Constitution, to provide by Law for the punishment, by fine, or
imprisonment in the Penitentiary, or both, in the discretion of the Court, of any person,
who shall bribe, or attempt to bribe, any Executive, or Judicial officer of the State of
Maryland, or any member, or officer of the General Assembly of the State of Maryland, or
of any Municipal corporation in the State of Maryland, or any Executive officer of such
corporation, in order to influence [him] THE MEMBER OR OFFICER in the performance of
any of [his] THE MEMBER’S OR OFFICER’S official duties; and, also, to provide by Law for
the punishment, by fine, or imprisonment in the Penitentiary, or both, in the discretion of
the Court, of any of said officers, or members, who shall demand, or receive any bribe, fee,
reward, or testimonial, for the performance of [his] THE MEMBER’S OR OFFICER’S official
duties, or for neglecting, or failing to perform the same; and, also, to provide by Law for
compelling any person, so bribing, or attempting to bribe, or so demanding, or receiving a
bribe, fee, reward, or testimonial, to testify against any person, or persons, who may have

HOUSE BILL 1488
committed any of said offenses; provided, that any person, so compelled to testify, shall be
exempted from trial and punishment for the offence, of which [he] THE PERSON may have
been guilty; and any person, convicted of such offense, shall, as part of the punishment
thereof, be forever disfranchised and disqualified from holding any office of trust, or profit,
in this State.
Article IV – Judiciary Department
4.
Any Judge shall be removed from office by the Governor, on conviction in a Court of
Law, of incompetency, of wilful neglect of duty, misbehavior in office, or any other crime, or
on impeachment, according to this Constitution, or the Laws of the State; or on the address
of the General Assembly, two–thirds of each House concurring in such address, and the
accused having been notified of the charges against [him] THE JUDGE, and having had
opportunity of making [his] THEIR defence.
5.
Upon every occurrence or recurrence of a vacancy through death, resignation,
removal, disqualification by reason of age or otherwise, or expiration of the term of fifteen
years of any judge of a circuit court, or creation of the office of any such judge, or in any
other way, the Governor shall appoint a person duly qualified to fill said office, who shall
hold the same until the election and qualification of [his] THE JUDGE’S successor. [His]
THE JUDGE’S successor shall be elected at the first biennial general election for
Representatives in Congress after the expiration of the term of fifteen years (if the vacancy
occurred in that way) or the first such general election after one year after the occurrence
of the vacancy in any other way than through expiration of such term. Except in case of
reappointment of a judge upon expiration of [his] THE JUDGE’S term of fifteen years, no
person shall be appointed who will become disqualified by reason of age and thereby unable
to continue to hold office until the prescribed time when [his] THE JUDGE’S successor
would have been elected.
6.
All Judges shall, by virtue of their offices, be Conservators of the Peace throughout
the State; and no fees, or perquisites, commission, or reward of any kind shall be allowed
to any Judge in this State, besides [his] THE JUDGE’S annual salary, for the discharge of
any Judicial duty.
7.
No Judge shall sit in any case wherein [he] THE JUDGE may be interested, or where
either of the parties may be connected with [him] THE JUDGE, by affinity or consanguinity,
within such degrees as now are, or may hereafter be prescribed by Law, or where [he] THE
JUDGE shall have been of counsel in the case.

HOUSE BILL 1488 15
14B.
No member of the General Assembly at which the addition of Section 14A was
proposed, if otherwise qualified, shall be ineligible for appointment or election as a judge of
any intermediate court of appeal, established by law by the General Assembly pursuant to
said Section 14A, by reason of [his] THE PERSON’S membership in such General Assembly.
18B.
(a) For the purpose of implementing the amendments to this article, dealing with
the selection and tenure of appellate court judges, the following provisions shall govern.
(b) Each judge of an appellate court who is in office for an elected term on the
effective date of these amendments, unless [he] THE JUDGE dies, resigns, retires, or is
otherwise lawfully removed, shall continue in office until the general election next after the
end of [his] THE JUDGE’S elected term, or until [his] THE JUDGE’S seventieth birthday,
whichever first occurs. [His] THE JUDGE’S continuance in office is then subject to the
provisions of section 5A(c) and (d) of this article, applicable to judges of that court, but in
no event shall any judge continue in office after [his] THEIR seventieth birthday.
(c) Each judge of a court specified in subsection (b) who is in office on the effective
date of these amendments, but who has not been elected to that office by the voters, shall,
within fifteen days after the effective date of these amendments, be reappointed to that
office. [His] THE JUDGE’S continuance in office is then subject to the provisions of section
5A(c) and (d) of this article, applicable to judges of that court, but in no event shall any
judge continue in office after [his] THEIR seventieth birthday.
21.
(a) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) the General Assembly shall
determine by law the number of judges of the circuit court in each county and circuit. These
judges shall be selected in accordance with Sections 3 and 5 of this Article.
(b) There shall be at least four circuit court judges resident in each circuit, and at
least one circuit court judge shall be resident in each county. There shall be at least two
such judges resident in Anne Arundel County, at least three resident in Baltimore County,
at least four resident in Prince George’s County, and at least five resident in Montgomery
County.
(c) The senior judge in length of service in each circuit shall be the chief judge of
the circuit. The other judges shall be associate judges.
(d) Except as otherwise provided by law, one judge shall constitute a quorum for
the transaction of any business.

HOUSE BILL 1488
(e) The terms of the circuit courts shall be determined by law.
(f) A person is not ineligible for appointment or election as a judge because [he]
THAT PERSON was a member of the General Assembly at a time when the number or
salary of judges were increased or decreased.
24.
The salary of each Chief Judge and of each Associate Judge of the Circuit Court shall
not be diminished during [his] THE JUDGE’S continuance in office.
25.
There shall be a Clerk of the Circuit Court for each County and Baltimore City, who
shall be elected by a plurality of the qualified voters of said County or City, and shall hold
[his] THEIR office for four years from the time of [his] THEIR election, and until [his] A
successor is elected and qualified, and be re–eligible, subject to be removed for wilful neglect
of duty or other misdemeanor in office, on conviction in a Court of Law. In case of a vacancy
in the office of Clerk of a Circuit Court, the Judges of that Court may fill the vacancy until
the general election for Delegates to the General Assembly, to be held next thereafter, when
a successor shall be elected for the term of four years.
41.
There shall be a Register of Wills in each county of the State, and the City of
Baltimore, to be elected by the legal and qualified voters of said counties and city,
respectively, who shall hold [his] office for four years from the time of [his] THAT
PERSON’S election and until [his] A successor is elected and qualified; [he] THE
REGISTER shall be re–eligible, and subject at all times to removal for willful neglect of
duty, or misdemeanor in office in the same manner that the Clerks of the Courts are
removable. In the event of any vacancy in the office of the Register of Wills, said vacancy
shall be filled by the Judges of the Orphans’ Court, in which such vacancy occurs, until the
next general election for Delegates to the General Assembly when a Register shall be
elected to serve for four years thereafter.
41C.
Each District Court judge shall devote full time to [his] THEIR judicial duties, shall
have the qualifications prescribed by Section 2 of this Article, and shall be a resident of the
district in which [he] THE JUDGE holds office. The number of judges for any district may
be increased or decreased by the General Assembly from time to time, subject to the
requirements of Section 41B of this Article, and any vacancy so created shall be filled as
provided in Section 41D of this Article.
41D.

HOUSE BILL 1488 17
The Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint each
judge of the District Court whenever for any reason a vacancy shall exist in the office. All
hearings, deliberations, and debate on the confirmation of appointees of the Governor shall
be public, and no hearings, deliberations or debate thereon shall be conducted by the Senate
or any committee or subcommittee thereof in secret or executive session. Confirmation by
the Senate shall be made upon a majority vote of all members of the Senate. A judge
appointed by the Governor may take office upon qualification and before confirmation by
the Senate, but shall cease to hold office at the close of the regular annual session of the
General Assembly next following [his] THE JUDGE’S appointment or during which [he]
THAT JUDGE shall have been appointed by the Governor, if the Senate shall not have
confirmed [his] THAT JUDGE’S appointment before then. Each judge appointed by the
Governor and confirmed by the Senate shall hold the office for a term of ten years or until
[he] THAT JUDGE shall have attained the age of seventy years whichever may first occur.
If the ten year term of a judge shall expire before that judge shall have attained the age of
seventy years, that judge shall be reappointed by the Governor, with the Senate’s consent,
for another ten year term or until [he] THAT JUDGE shall have attained the age of seventy
years, whichever may first occur. To the extent inconsistent herewith, the provisions of
Sections 3 and 5 of this Article shall not apply to judges of the District Court.
41F.
The Chief Judge of the District Court shall appoint, to serve at [his] THE CHIEF
JUDGE’S pleasure, a Chief Clerk of that Court. [He] THE CHIEF JUDGE OF THE
DISTRICT COURT shall also appoint, to serve at [his] THE CHIEF JUDGE’S pleasure, and
upon the recommendation of the administrative judge of the district, a chief administrative
clerk for each district. The chief clerk shall perform such duties in the administration of
the District Court as may be assigned [him] TO THE CHIEF CLERK by the chief judge or
as may be prescribed by rule or by law. Each chief administrative clerk shall perform such
duties in the administration of the District Court as may be assigned [him] TO THE CHIEF
ADMINISTRATIVE CLERK by the administrative judge of [his] THE district or as may be
prescribed by rule or by law. There shall be in each County a clerk of the District Court
whose appointment, term, and compensation shall be prescribed by law. The Chief Judge
of the District Court, upon recommendation of the respective administrative judges, shall
appoint such deputy clerks, constables, and other officers of the District Court as may be
necessary. It shall be the duty of the General Assembly to prescribe by law a fixed
compensation for all such officers.
41H.
The salary of a judge of the District Court shall not be reduced during [his] THE
JUDGE’S continuance in office.
41–I.
For the purpose of implementing the amendments to Articles IV, XV and XVII of this
Constitution, establishing the District Court, the following provisions shall govern.

HOUSE BILL 1488
(a) The provisions of Section 41D of this Article shall govern initial
vacancies in the office of judge of the District Court. Each full–time judge of the People’s
Court of Baltimore City, the Municipal Court of Baltimore City, and of the People’s Courts
of Anne Arundel, Montgomery, Prince George’s, Wicomico Counties and Baltimore County
who is in office on the effective date of these amendments shall continue in office as a judge
of the District Court in [his] THAT JUDGE’S district and county of residence (or in
Baltimore City) for the remainder of the term for which [he] THAT JUDGE was elected or
appointed, and if [his] THAT JUDGE’S term expires prior to January 1, 1971, such judge
shall be re–appointed by the Governor, if the Senate consents, in accordance with the
provisions of Section 41D of this Article, subject to the Provisions of the Constitution
respecting age, removal and retirement; provided that the term of any such judge of a
People’s Court who would be ineligible for appointment as a judge of the District Court
under this Article shall expire on the effective date of these amendments. Thereafter,
retention of any judge who is retained in office pursuant to the preceding provisions of this
subsection shall be pursuant to Section 41D of this Article. No People’s Court judge, judge
of the Housing Court of Baltimore County, or Justice of the Peace shall be appointed or
elected or exercise any power or jurisdiction.
(b) Each full–time clerk of a justice of the peace designated as trial magistrate of
a People’s Court, of the Municipal Court of Baltimore City, and the chief constable of the
People’s Court of Baltimore City who is in office on the day before the first Monday in July,
1970, shall become a deputy clerk of the District Court on the first Monday in July 1970.
The taking effect of the aforegoing amendments shall not of itself affect the tenure, term,
status, retirement, or compensation of any person then holding public office, position, or
employment in this State, except as provided in the amendments.
(c) All statutory references to justices of the peace designated as trial
magistrates, to People’s Courts, to the Municipal Court of Baltimore City or to the Housing
Court of Baltimore County, shall be deemed to refer to the District Court in the appropriate
district, county or Baltimore City, to the extent not inconsistent with this Constitution.
(d) No member of the General Assembly at which these amendments were
proposed, or at which the number of or salary of any such judges may have been increased
or decreased by the General Assembly from time to time, if otherwise qualified, is ineligible
for appointment or election as a judge of the District Court by reason of [his] THAT
PERSON’S membership in the General Assembly.
44.
There shall be elected in each county and in Baltimore City one person, resident in
said county or City, above the age of twenty–five years, and for at least five years preceding
[his] THAT PERSON’S election a citizen of the State, to the office of Sheriff. [He] THE
SHERIFF shall hold office for four years, until [his] A successor is duly elected and
qualified, give such bond, exercise such powers and perform such duties as now are or may
hereafter be fixed by law.

HOUSE BILL 1488 19
In case of vacancy by death, resignation, refusal to serve, or neglect to qualify or give
bond, or by disqualification or removal from the County or City, the Governor shall appoint
a person to be Sheriff for the remainder of the official term.
The Sheriff in each county and in Baltimore City shall receive such salary or
compensation and such expenses necessary to the conduct of [his] THE office as may be
fixed by law. All fees collected by the Sheriff shall be accounted for and paid to the Treasury
of the several counties and of Baltimore City, respectively.
Article V – Attorney–General and State’s Attorneys
1.
There shall be an [Attorney–General] ATTORNEY GENERAL elected by the
qualified voters of the State, on general ticket, on the Tuesday next after the first Monday
in the month of November, nineteen hundred and fifty–eight, and on the same day, in every
fourth year thereafter, who shall hold [his] THE office OF ATTORNEY GENERAL for four
years from the time of [his] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S election and qualification, and
until [his] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S successor is elected and qualified, and shall be
re–eligible thereto, and shall be subject to removal for incompetency, willful neglect of duty
or misdemeanor in office, on conviction in a Court of Law.
3.
(a) The Attorney General shall:
(1) Prosecute and defend on the part of the State all cases pending in the
appellate courts of the State, in the Supreme Court of the United States or the inferior
Federal Courts, by or against the State, or in which the State may be interested, except
those criminal appeals otherwise prescribed by the General Assembly.
(2) Investigate, commence, and prosecute or defend any civil or criminal
suit or action or category of such suits or actions in any of the Federal Courts or in any
Court of this State, or before administrative agencies and quasi legislative bodies, on the
part of the State or in which the State may be interested, which the General Assembly by
law or joint resolution, or the Governor, shall have directed or shall direct to be
investigated, commenced and prosecuted or defended.
(3) When required by the General Assembly by law or joint resolution, or
by the Governor, aid any State’s Attorney or other authorized prosecuting officer in
investigating, commencing, and prosecuting any criminal suit or action or category of such
suits or actions brought by the State in any Court of this State.

HOUSE BILL 1488
(4) Give [his] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S opinion in writing whenever
required by the General Assembly or either branch thereof, the Governor, the Comptroller,
the Treasurer or any State’s Attorney on any legal matter or subject.
(b) The Attorney General shall have and perform any other duties and possess
any other powers, and appoint the number of deputies or assistants, as the General
Assembly from time to time may prescribe by law.
(c) The Attorney General shall receive for [his] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S
services the annual salary as the General Assembly from time to time may prescribe by
law, but [he] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL may not receive any fees, perquisites or rewards
whatever, in addition to [his] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S salary, for the performance of
any official duty.
(d) The Governor may not employ any additional counsel, in any case whatever,
unless authorized by the General Assembly.
7.
There shall be an Attorney for the State in each county and the City of Baltimore, to
be styled “The State’s Attorney”, who shall be elected by the voters thereof, respectively,
and shall hold [his] THAT office for four years from the first Monday in January next
ensuing [his] THAT PERSON’S election, and until [his] A successor shall be elected and
qualified; and shall be re–eligible thereto, and be subject to removal therefrom, for
incompetency, willful neglect of duty, or misdemeanor in office, on conviction in a Court of
Law, or by a vote of two–thirds of the Senate, on the recommendation of the
[Attorney–General] ATTORNEY GENERAL.
9.
The State’s Attorney shall perform such duties and receive such salary as shall be
prescribed by the General Assembly. If any State’s Attorney shall receive any other fee or
reward than such as is or may be allowed by law, [he] THE STATE’S ATTORNEY shall, on
conviction thereof, be removed from office; provided, that the State’s Attorney for Baltimore
City shall have the power to appoint a Deputy and such other Assistants as the Supreme
Bench of Baltimore City may authorize or approve and until otherwise provided by the
General Assembly, the said State’s Attorney, Deputy and Assistants shall receive the
following annual salaries: State’s Attorney, seven thousand five hundred dollars; Deputy
State’s Attorney, five thousand dollars; Assistant State’s Attorneys, four thousand dollars
each; said salaries, or such salaries as the General Assembly may subsequently provide
and such expenses for conducting the office of the State’s Attorney as the Supreme Bench
of Baltimore City may authorize or approve shall be paid by the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore to the extent that the total of them exceeds the fees of [his] THE office, or as the
General Assembly shall otherwise provide, and the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore
shall not be liable for appearance fees to the State’s Attorney.

HOUSE BILL 1488 21
10.
No person shall be eligible to the office of State’s Attorney, who has not been
admitted to practice Law in this State, and who has not resided, for at least two years, in
the county, or city, in which [he] THAT PERSON may be elected.
11.
In case of a vacancy in the office of State’s Attorney, or of [his] THE STATE’S
ATTORNEY’S removal from the county or city in which [he] THE STATE’S ATTORNEY
shall have been elected, or on [his] THE STATE’S ATTORNEY’S conviction as herein
specified, the Judge or Judges resident in the county or, if there be no resident Judge, the
Judge or Judges having jurisdiction in the Circuit Court of the county in which the vacancy
occurs, or by the Supreme Bench of Baltimore City for a vacancy occurring in Baltimore
City, shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy for the residue of the term.
12.
The State’s Attorney in each county, and the City of Baltimore, shall have authority
to collect, and give receipt, in the name of the State, for such sums of money as may be
collected by [him] THE STATE’S ATTORNEY, and forthwith make return of and pay over
the same to the proper accounting officer. And the State’s Attorney of each county, and the
City of Baltimore, before [he] THE STATE’S ATTORNEY shall enter on the discharge of
[his] THAT PERSON’S duties, and from time to time thereafter, shall give such corporate
surety bond as may hereafter be prescribed by Act of the General Assembly.
Article VI – Treasury Department
1.
(a) There shall be a Treasury Department, consisting of a Comptroller chosen by
the qualified electors of the State, who shall receive such salary as may be fixed by law; and
a Treasurer, to be appointed on joint ballot by the two Houses of the Legislature at each
regular session in which begins the term of the Governor, who shall receive such salary as
may be fixed by law.
(b) The terms of office of the Comptroller and Treasurer shall be for four years,
and until their successors shall qualify; and neither of the officers shall be allowed, or
receive any fees, commissions or perquisites of any kind in addition to [his salary] THEIR
SALARIES for the performance of any duty or services whatsoever.
(c) (1) In case of a vacancy in the office of the Comptroller by death or
otherwise, the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall fill such
vacancy by appointment as provided in this subsection.

HOUSE BILL 1488
(2) The Governor shall appoint one of three individuals whose names are
submitted to the Governor in writing, within 30 days after the occurrence of the vacancy,
by the State Central Committee of the political party, if any, with which the vacating
Comptroller had been affiliated at the time of the Comptroller’s last election or
appointment.
(3) Each individual whose name is submitted to the Governor must have
been a registered voter affiliated with the political party of the vacating Comptroller on the
date immediately preceding the date on which the vacancy occurred.
(4) The Governor shall make the appointment within 15 days after names
are submitted by the State Central Committee of the appropriate political party.
(5) If names are not submitted by the State Central Committee of the
appropriate political party within 30 days after the occurrence of the vacancy, the Governor
shall appoint within another period of 15 days any qualified individual who was a
registered voter affiliated with the political party of the vacating Comptroller on the date
immediately preceding the date on which the vacancy occurred.
(6) If the vacating Comptroller was not affiliated with a political party at
the time of the Comptroller’s last election or appointment, the Governor shall appoint any
qualified individual within 15 days after the occurrence of the vacancy.
(7) Except as provided in paragraph (8) of this subsection, an individual
appointed under this subsection shall serve until a successor is elected under paragraph (9)
of this subsection to fill the remainder of the term.
(8) An individual appointed under this subsection shall serve for the
remainder of the term if the vacancy occurs after the date that is 21 days before the deadline
for filing certificates of candidacy for the regular statewide election that is held in the
second year of the term.
(9) If the vacancy occurs on or before the date that is 21 days before the
deadline for filing certificates of candidacy for the regular statewide election that is held in
the second year of the term, the Governor shall issue a proclamation immediately after the
occurrence of the vacancy declaring that a special primary election and a special general
election shall be held at the same time as the regular statewide primary election and
regular statewide general election that are held in the second year of the term.
(d) In case of a vacancy in the office of the Treasurer by death or otherwise, the
Deputy Treasurer shall act as Treasurer until the next regular or extraordinary session of
the Legislature following the creation of the vacancy, whereupon the Legislature shall
choose a successor to serve for the duration of the unexpired term of office.
(e) The Comptroller and the Treasurer shall keep their offices at the seat of
government, and shall take such oaths and enter into such bonds for the faithful discharge
of their duties as are now or may hereafter be prescribed by law.

HOUSE BILL 1488 23
2.
The Comptroller shall have the general superintendence of the fiscal affairs of the
State; [he] THE COMPTROLLER shall digest and prepare plans for the improvement and
management of the revenue, and for the support of the public credit; prepare and report
estimates of the revenue and expenditures of the State; superintend and enforce the prompt
collection of all taxes and revenue; adjust and settle, on terms prescribed by law, with
delinquent collectors and receivers of taxes and State revenue; preserve all public accounts;
and decide on the forms of keeping and stating accounts. [He] THE COMPTROLLER, or
such of [his] THE COMPTROLLER’S deputies as may be authorized to do so by the
Legislature, shall grant, under regulations prescribed by Law, all warrants for money to be
paid out of the Treasury, in pursuance of appropriations by law, and countersign all checks
drawn by the Treasurer upon any bank or banks in which the moneys of the State, may,
from time to time, be deposited. [He] THE COMPTROLLER shall prescribe the formalities
of the transfer of stock, or other evidence of the State debt, and countersign the same,
without which such evidence shall not be valid; [he] THE COMPTROLLER shall make to
the General Assembly full reports of all [his] THE COMPTROLLER’S proceedings, and of
the state of the Treasury Department within ten days after the commencement of each
session; and perform such other duties as shall be prescribed by law.
3.
The Treasurer shall receive the moneys of the State, and, until otherwise prescribed
by law, deposit them, as soon as received, to the credit of the State, in such bank or banks
as [he] THE TREASURER may, from time to time, with the approval of the Governor, select
(the said bank or banks giving security, satisfactory to the Governor, for the safekeeping
and forthcoming, when required of said deposits), and [he] THE TREASURER or such of
[his] THE TREASURER’S deputies as may be authorized to do so by the Legislature shall
disburse the same for the purposes of the State according to law, upon warrants drawn by
the Comptroller, or [his] THE COMPTROLLER’S duly authorized deputy, and on checks
countersigned by the Comptroller, or [his] THE COMPTROLLER’S duly authorized deputy.
The Legislature may prescribe, by law, for the Treasurer to disburse the moneys of the
State by a system other than by the use of checks. The Treasurer or such of [his] THE
TREASURER’S deputies as may be authorized to do so by the Legislature shall take receipts
for all moneys paid from the Treasury Department; and receipt for moneys received by
[him] THE TREASURER shall be endorsed upon warrants signed, by the Comptroller, or
such deputy as may be authorized to do so by law, without which warrants, so signed, no
acknowledgment of money received into the Treasury shall be valid; and upon warrants
issued by the Comptroller, or [his] THE COMPTROLLER’S duly authorized deputy, the
Treasurer shall make arrangements for the payment of the interest of the public debt, and
for the purchase thereof, on account of the sinking fund. Every bond, certificate, or other
evidence of the debt of the State shall be signed by the Treasurer, Chief Deputy Treasurer,
or a Deputy Treasurer, and countersigned by the Comptroller, Chief Deputy Comptroller,
or a Deputy Comptroller; and no new certificate or other evidence intended to replace
another shall be issued until the old one shall be delivered to the Treasurer, and authority

HOUSE BILL 1488
executed in due form for the transfer of the same filed in [his] THE TREASURER’S office,
and the transfer accordingly made on the books thereof, and the certificate or other
evidence cancelled; but the Legislature may make provisions for the loss of certificates, or
other evidences of the debt; and may prescribe, by law, the manner in which the Treasurer
shall receive and keep the moneys of the State.
4.
The Treasurer shall render [his] THE TREASURER’S Accounts, quarterly, to the
Comptroller; and shall publish, monthly, in such newspapers as the Governor may direct,
an abstract thereof, showing the amount of cash on hand, and the place, or places of deposit
thereof; and on the third day of each regular session of the legislature, he shall submit to
the Senate and House of Delegates fair and accurate copies of all Accounts by [him] THE
TREASURER, from time to time, rendered and settled with the Comptroller. [He] THE
TREASURER shall, at all times, submit to the Comptroller the inspection of the money in
[his] THE TREASURER’S hands, and perform all other duties that shall be prescribed by
Law.
5.
The Comptroller shall qualify, and enter on the duties of [his] THE
COMPTROLLER’S office, on the third Monday of January next succeeding the time of [his]
THE COMPTROLLER’S Election, or as soon thereafter as practicable. And the Treasurer
shall qualify within one month after [his] THE TREASURER’S appointment by the
Legislature.
6.
Whenever during the recess of the Legislature charges shall be preferred to the
Governor against the Comptroller or Treasurer, for incompetency, malfeasance in office,
willful neglect of duty, or misappropriation of the funds of the State, it shall be the duty of
the Governor forthwith to notify the party so charged, and fix a day for a hearing of said
charges; and if, in the case of the Comptroller, from the evidence taken, under oath, on said
hearing before the Governor, the said allegations shall be sustained, it shall be the duty of
the Governor to remove the Comptroller and appoint another in [his] THE
COMPTROLLER’S place, who shall hold the office for the unexpired term of the Comptroller
so removed. However, if, in the case of the Treasurer, from the evidence taken under oath
in the hearing before the Governor, the allegations are sustained, it is the duty of the
Governor to remove the Treasurer, and the deputy treasurer shall act as Treasurer until
the next regular or extraordinary session of the Legislature following the appointment,
whereupon a successor shall be chosen by the Legislature who shall serve for the unexpired
term of the Treasurer so removed.
Article IX – Militia and Military Affairs
2.

HOUSE BILL 1488 25
There shall be an Adjutant General, appointed by the Governor, by and with the
advice and consent of the Senate. [He] THE ADJUTANT GENERAL shall hold [his] THE
office until the appointment and qualification of [his] A successor, or until removed in
pursuance of the sentence of a Court Martial. [He] THE ADJUTANT GENERAL shall
perform such duties, and receive such compensation, or emoluments, as are now, or may be
prescribed by Law. [He] THE ADJUTANT GENERAL shall discharge the duties of [his]
THE office at the seat of Government, unless absent, under orders, on duty; and no other
officer of the General Staff of the Militia shall receive salary or pay, except when on service,
and mustered in with troops.
Article XI – City of Baltimore
1.
The Inhabitants of the City of Baltimore, qualified by Law to vote in said city for
members of the House of Delegates, shall on the fourth Wednesday of October, eighteen
hundred and sixty–seven, and on the same day in every fourth year thereafter, elect a
person to be Mayor of the City of Baltimore, who shall have such qualifications, receive
such compensation, discharge such duties, and have such powers as are now, or may
hereafter be prescribed by Law; and the term of whose office shall commence on the first
Monday of November succeeding [his] THE MAYOR’S election, and shall continue for four
years, and until [his] A successor shall have qualified; and [he] THAT PERSON shall be
ineligible for the term next succeeding that for which [he] THAT PERSON was elected.
4.
The regular session of the City Council of Baltimore, (which shall be annual,) shall
commence on the third Monday of January of each year, and shall not continue more than
ninety days, exclusive of Sundays; but the Mayor may convene the City Council in extra
session whenever, and as often as it may appear to [him] THE MAYOR that the public good
may require; but no called, or extra session shall last longer than twenty days, exclusive of
Sundays.
5.
No person, elected and qualified as Mayor, or as a member of the City Council, shall,
during the term for which [he] THAT PERSON was elected, hold any other office of profit
or trust, created, or to be created, by the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore, or by any
Law relating to the Corporation of Baltimore, or hold any employment, or position, the
compensation of which shall be paid, directly or indirectly, out of the City Treasury; nor
shall any such person be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract, to which the City
is a party; nor shall it be lawful for any person, holding any office, under the City, to be
interested, while holding such office, in any contract, to which the City is a party.
Article XI–A – Local Legislation

HOUSE BILL 1488
1.
On demand of the Mayor of Baltimore and City Council of the City of Baltimore, or
on petition bearing the signatures of not less than 20% of the registered voters of said City
or any County (Provided, however, that in any case 10,000 signatures shall be sufficient to
complete a petition), the Board of Election Supervisors of said City or County shall provide
at the next general or congressional election, occurring after such demand or the filing of
such petition, for the election of a charter board of eleven registered voters of said City or
five registered voters in any such Counties. Nominations for members for said charter
board may be made not less than forty days prior to said election by the Mayor of Baltimore
and City Council of the City of Baltimore or the County Commissioners of such County, or
not less than twenty days prior to said election by petition bearing the signatures written
in their own handwriting (and not by their mark) of not less than 5% of the registered voters
of the said City of Baltimore or said County; provided, that in any case Two thousand
signatures of registered voters shall be sufficient to complete any such nominating petition,
and if not more than eleven registered voters of the City of Baltimore or not more than five
registered voters in any such County are so nominated their names shall not be printed on
the ballot, but said eleven registered voters in the City of Baltimore or five in such County
shall constitute said charter board from and after the date of said election. At said election
the ballot shall contain the names of said nominees in alphabetical order without any
indication of the source of their nomination, and shall also be so arranged as to permit the
voter to vote for or against the creation of said charter board, but the vote cast against said
creation shall not be held to bar the voter from expressing [his] THEIR choice among the
nominees for said board, and if the majority of the votes cast for and against the creation
of said charter board shall be against said creation the election of the members of said
charter board shall be void; but if such majority shall be in favor of the creation of said
charter board, then and in that event the eleven nominees of the City of Baltimore or five
nominees in the County receiving the largest number of votes shall constitute the charter
board, and said charter board, or a majority thereof, shall prepare within 18 months from
the date of said election a charter or form of government for said city or such county and
present the same to the Mayor of Baltimore or President of the Board of County
Commissioners of such county, who shall publish the same in at least two newspapers of
general circulation published in the City of Baltimore or County within thirty days after it
shall be reported to [him] THE MAYOR OF BALTIMORE OR PRESIDENT OF THE BOARD
OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS. Such charter shall be submitted to the voters of said City
or County at the next general or Congressional election after the report of said charter to
said Mayor of Baltimore or President of the Board of County Commissioners; and if a
majority of the votes cast for and against the adoption of said charter shall be in favor of
such adoption, the said charter from and after the thirtieth day from the date of such
election shall become the law of said City or County, subject only to the Constitution and
Public General Laws of this State, and any public local laws inconsistent with the
provisions of said charter and any former charter of the City of Baltimore or County shall
be thereby repealed.
7.

HOUSE BILL 1488 27
The word “Petition” as used in this Article means one or more sheets written or
printed, or partly written and partly printed. There shall be attached to each paper of
signatures filed with a petition an affidavit of the person procuring those signatures that
the signatures were affixed in [his] THAT PERSON’S presence and that, based upon the
person’s best knowledge and belief, every signature on the paper is genuine and bona fide
and that the signers are registered voters at the address set opposite or below their names.
The General Assembly shall prescribe by law the form of the petition, the manner for
verifying its authenticity, and other administrative procedures which facilitate the petition
process and which are not in conflict with this Article. The false signing of any name, or the
signing of any fictitious name to said petition shall be forgery, and the making of any false
affidavit in connection with said petition shall be perjury.
Article XV – Miscellaneous
1.
Every person holding any office created by, or existing under the Constitution, or
Laws of the State, or holding any appointment under any Court of this State, whose pay,
or compensation is derived from fees, or moneys coming into [his] THE OFFICER’S hands
for the discharge of [his] THEIR official duties, or, in any way, growing out of, or connected
with [his] THEIR office, shall keep a book in which shall be entered every sum, or sums of
money, received by [him] THE OFFICER, or on [his] THE OFFICER’S account, as a payment
or compensation for [his] THE OFFICER’S performance of official duties, a copy of which
entries in said book, verified by the oath of the officer, by whom it is directed to be kept,
shall be returned yearly to the Comptroller of the State for [his] THE COMPTROLLER’S
inspection, and that of the General Assembly of the State, to which the Comptroller shall,
at each regular session thereof, make a report showing what officers have complied with
this section; and each of the said officers, when the amount received by [him] THE OFFICER
for the year shall exceed the sum which [he] THE OFFICER is by Law entitled to retain, as
[his] THE OFFICER’S salary or compensation for the discharge of [his] THEIR duties, and
for the expenses of [his] THEIR office, shall yearly pay over to the Treasurer of the State
the amount of such excess, subject to such disposition thereof as the General Assembly may
direct; if any of such officers shall fail to comply with the requisitions of this section for the
period of thirty days after the expiration of each and every year of [his] THEIR office, such
officer shall be deemed to have vacated [his] THEIR office, and the Governor shall declare
the same vacant, and the vacancy therein shall be filled as in the case of vacancy for any
other cause, and such officer shall be subject to suit by the State for the amount that ought
to be paid into the Treasury.
5.
Except as the Constitution provides otherwise for any office, the General Assembly
may provide by law for a person to act in place of any elected or appointed officer of the
State who is unavailable to perform the duties of [his] THEIR office because [he] THE
OFFICER has become unable, or is or will be absent.

HOUSE BILL 1488
Article XVI – The Referendum
4.
A petition may consist of several papers, but each paper shall contain the full text,
or an accurate summary approved by the Attorney General, of the Act or part of Act
petitioned. There shall be attached to each paper of signatures filed with a petition an
affidavit of the person procuring those signatures that the signatures were affixed in [his]
THE PERSON’S presence and that, based upon the person’s best knowledge and belief,
every signature on the paper is genuine and bona fide and that the signers are registered
voters at the address set opposite or below their names. The General Assembly shall
prescribe by law the form of the petition, the manner for verifying its authenticity, and
other administrative procedures which facilitate the petition process and which are not in
conflict with this Article.
5.
(a) The General Assembly shall provide for furnishing the voters of the State the
text of all measures to be voted upon by the people; provided, that until otherwise provided
by law the same shall be published in the manner prescribed by Article XIV of the
Constitution for the publication of proposed Constitutional Amendments.
(b) All laws referred under the provisions of this Article shall be submitted
separately on the ballots to the voters of the people, but if containing more than two
hundred words, the full text shall not be printed on the official ballots, but the Secretary of
State shall prepare and submit a ballot title of each such measure in such form as to present
the purpose of said measure concisely and intelligently. The ballot title may be distinct
from the legislative title, but in any case the legislative title shall be sufficient. Upon each
of the ballots, following the ballot title or text, as the case may be, of each such measure,
there shall be printed the words “For the referred law” and “Against the referred law,” as
the case may be. The votes cast for and against any such referred law shall be returned to
the Governor in the manner prescribed with respect to proposed amendments to the
Constitution under Article XIV of this Constitution, and the Governor shall proclaim the
result of the election, and, if it shall appear that the majority of the votes cast on any such
measure were cast in favor thereof, the Governor shall by [his] proclamation declare the
same having received a majority of the votes to have been adopted by the people of
Maryland as a part of the laws of the State, to take effect thirty days after such election,
and in like manner and with like effect the Governor shall proclaim the result of the local
election as to any Public Local Law which shall have been submitted to the voters of any
County or of the City of Baltimore.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.

HOUSE BILL 1488 29
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.